California, session 20252026, AB1942.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 8.2 (commencing with Section 5040) is added to Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, to read: Article 8.2. Electric Bicycles5040. (a) A class 2 electric bicycle and a class 3 electric bicycle shall be registered with the department and shall display a special license plate issued by the department.(b) The special license plate shall be affixed to the rear of the electric bicycle and shall be clearly visible and legible at all times.5040.5. The department shall adopt regulations to implement this article, including, but not limited to, regulations on all of the following:(a) Application and issuance of registration and special license plates.(b) Plate size, placement, and visibility requirements.(c) Registration fees in an amount not to exceed the reasonable regulatory cost of issuing or renewing the registration.(d) Proof of ownership requirements, including the provision of a serial number for the registered electric bicycle.5040.7. A person operating a class 2 or class 3 electric bicycle in violation of this article is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, two hundred dollars ($200) for a second offense, and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each subsequent offense.5040.9. (a) The Electric Bicycle Registration Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. All moneys received by the department pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the fund. Except as provided in subdivision (b), all moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for the administration of this article.(b) (1) The sum of ____ dollars (S____) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Electric Bicycle Registration Fund as a loan that shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure until ____ for purposes of administering this article.(2) The loan amount shall be repaid by the department to the General Fund together with interest in the amount that those moneys would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account.(3) Moneys received by the department pursuant to this article shall be used to repay the loan until the loan is fully repaid.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________